

Breht T. Feigh: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 23, 2017 1:58 AM ET
Health Care Technology

Company Overview of Press Ganey Holdings, Inc.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
Breht T. Feigh  Chief Financial Officer, Press Ganey Holdings, Inc.AgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 0 Board Members in 0 different organizations across 3 different industries.50--
Background

		Mr. Breht T. Feigh has been the Chief Financial Officer of Press Ganey Holdings, Inc. since August 31, 2015. Mr. Feigh is responsible for financial planning, reporting, tax, treasury and facilities. He has more than 25 years of experience. He spent the 18 years with American Dental Partners in roles of increasing responsibility. He served as Executive Vice President of American Dental Partners, Inc., since November 2003 and served as its Chief Development Officer since ... 2013. Mr. Feigh served as Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of American Dental Partners, Inc from January 2001 to 2013. Earlier, Mr. Feigh served as Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer of American Dental Partners, Inc. from January 2001 to October 2003, Vice President of Strategic Initiatives from January 2000 to December 2000 and as Director of Corporate Development from October 1997 to December 1999. Mr. Feigh was employed in the health care mergers and acquisition group of Robertson, Stephens & Company from 1996 to 1997. From 1994 to 1996, he was employed in the Latin American investment banking group of ING Barings and from 1989 to 1993, he was employed in the health care investment banking group of Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. He received a BS in Finance from Indiana University and holds an MSc from the London School of Economics.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
401 Edgewater PlaceWakefield, Massachusetts 01880United StatesPhone: 781-295-5000Fax: --
Board Members Memberships
				There is no Board Members Memberships data available.
				Education
BS Indiana University, BloomingtonMS The London School of Economics and Political Science
Other Affiliations
American Dental Partners, Inc.Indiana University, BloomingtonPress Ganey Associates, Inc.The London School of Economics and Political Science


Annual Compensation
				There is no Annual Compensation data available.
				Stocks Options
				There is no Stock Options data available.
				Total Compensation
				There is no Total Compensation data available.
			



Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONThere is no Competitor Compensation data available.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Press Ganey Holdings, Inc., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close






























Breht Feigh, Press Ganey Holdings Inc: Profile & Biography - Bloomberg


































































  























Feedback





Breht Feigh

Chief Financial Officer,
Press Ganey Holdings Inc






Career History




Chief Financial Officer
Press Ganey Holdings Inc, 8/2015-PRESENT


VP/CFO/Treasurer
American Dental Partners Inc, 1/2001-10/2003


VP:Strategic Initiatives
American Dental Partners Inc, 1/2000-12/2000


Director:Corp Development
American Dental Partners Inc, 10/1997-12/1999


Exec VP/Chief Dev Ofcr
American Dental Partners Inc, 2013-UNKNOWN


Exec VP/CFO/Treasurer
American Dental Partners Inc, 11/2003-UNKNOWN


Show More









Website:
www.pressganey.com






Corporate Information
Address:

401 Edgewater Place
Suite 500
Wakefield, MA 02421
United States


Phone:
1-781-295-5000


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.pressganey.com











From The Web












Personal Information



Education



Indiana University
Bachelor's Degree


London School of Economics & Political Science
Master's Degree








Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data


































Insider Trading - Feigh Breht T - Form 4 SEC Filings












Home |
Archives |
Products |
About |
Contact |
FAQ |



New User?
Sign Up | 
Sign In









Form 4 Filings


Insider Buys


Significant Buys


Penny StocksInsider Buying


Insider Sales




Insider Buy Sell Ratios


Stock Options


Insider TradingStock Screener


Insider TradingGraph View


Insider Watch





Sec Filings Insider Trading - Feigh Breht T





Select Time period: 
1 Month
2 Months
3 Months
6 Months
1 Year
2 Years
3 Years
4 Years
All Data
 

     



google

   



yahoo!



Send this page to:  

Blog
  



Digg

  



Reddit

  



Facebook

  



Stumble

  



del.icio.us








Enter Stock Ticker Symbol or Cik:




Cik Lookup...






Search By Company or Insider Name:







"Insiders might sell their shares for any number of reasons, but they buy them for only one:
they think the price will rise"
- Peter Lynch ==>>

What is insider trading>>



Email a friend >>...







Historical filings delayed by 6 months. New user?
Sign Up for real time data.
Existing user?
Sign In

Stock options: Exercise, Award, Grant, Conversion



TransactionDate
ReportedDate
ExercisableExpiration
Company
Symnbol
InsiderRelationship
SharesTraded
ConversionPrice
SharesOwned
Filing




2016-10-21Tax Withholding
2016-10-253:50 pm
N/AN/A
Press Ganey Holdings Inc.
PGND
Feigh Breht TChief Financial Officer
11,641
$40.5
6,065(Direct)
View


2016-10-21Disposition
2016-10-253:50 pm
N/AN/A
Press Ganey Holdings Inc.
PGND
Feigh Breht TChief Financial Officer
4,340
$40.5
6,065(Direct)
View


2016-10-21Disposition
2016-10-253:50 pm
N/A2026-02-17
Press Ganey Holdings Inc.
PGND
Feigh Breht TChief Financial Officer
13,625
$26.18
6,065(Direct)
View


2016-08-31Tax Withholding
2016-09-015:43 pm
N/AN/A
Press Ganey Holdings Inc.
PGND
Feigh Breht TChief Financial Officer
537
$40.29
15,981(Direct)
View


2016-02-18Option Award
2016-02-224:29 pm
N/AN/A
Press Ganey Holdings Inc.
PGND
Feigh Breht TChief Financial Officer
8,250
$0
19,690(Direct)
View


2016-02-18Option Award
2016-02-224:29 pm
N/A2026-02-17
Press Ganey Holdings Inc.
PGND
Feigh Breht TChief Financial Officer
19,690
$26.18
19,690(Direct)
View


2015-08-31Option Award
2015-09-026:28 pm
N/AN/A
Press Ganey Holdings Inc.
PGND
Feigh Breht TChief Financial Officer
8,268
$0
19,088(Direct)
View


2015-08-31Option Award
2015-09-026:28 pm
N/A2025-08-30
Press Ganey Holdings Inc.
PGND
Feigh Breht TChief Financial Officer
19,088
$32.25
19,088(Direct)
View









    © 2005-2017 SecForm4.Com All rights reserved.
    Archives:
    2017 2016 2015 2014 2013 2012 ... 
    Sun, 23 Jul 2017 00:58:36 -0500
  

    SEC is the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. EDGAR is a trademark of the SEC.
    SecForm4.Com is not affiliated with or approved by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC).
Terms of Use |
    Privacy Statement |
  














Employment Agreement (breht T. Feigh) - Press Ganey Holdings, Inc.  - Delaware
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Employment Agreement     > EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (Breht T. Feigh)

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Employment Agreement (breht T. Feigh)
Employment Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Employment Agreement involves PRESS GANEY HOLDINGS, INC. | PRESS GANEY ASSOCIATES, INC. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (Breht T. Feigh) Governing Law: Delaware      Date: 11/6/2015 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day










 Exhibit
10.3
 

 

EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT

(Breht T. Feigh)
 

EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (the “
Agreement ”) dated as of August
 6 th ,
between PRESS GANEY ASSOCIATES, INC.,
an Indiana corporation (the “ Company
”) and BREHT T. FEIGH (the “
Employee ”).
 

WHEREAS,
the Company desires to
employ the Employee commencing August 31, 2015
(the “ Effective Date ”) and to
enter into an
agreement embodying the terms of
such employment; and
 

WHEREAS,
the Employee desires to be employed by the Company and
enter into such agreement.
 

NOW, THEREFORE, in
consideration
of the mutual agreements, provisions and covenants contained herein,
and intending to be legally bound hereby,
the parties hereto agree as follows:
 






1. Term .




 






(a) The term of
the Employee’s employment with
the Company under this Agreement
shall commence on the 
Effective Date  and shall continue until
the fourth (4th) anniversary of
the Effective Date (the “ Expiration
Date ”) (such period, the “
Initial Term ”); 
provided, however,  that commencing on
the Expiration Date and
on each anniversary of the Expiration Date thereafter,
unless either party hereto gives the other
party at least six (6) weeks’ prior written
notice of its or his election not to extend
the period of
the Employee’s employment with
the Company and its affiliates, as applicable,
hereunder, the term shall automatically be extended
for an additional one-year period on
the same terms and conditions set forth
herein, unless otherwise agreed upon
by the parties hereto
(each such extension,  a “
Renewal Term ”);  provided 
further, however, that the Employee’s
employment with the Company and
its affiliates, as applicable,
under this Agreement
may be terminated pursuant to
the provisions of Section 4
at any time prior to the expiration of
the Initial Term or any then current
Renewal Term.  The period commencing on
the Effective Date and ending on
the date of termination
of the Employee’s employment with the Company and
its affiliates,
as applicable, under this Agreement
is referred to herein as the “ Term
”.




 






(b) The Employee agrees and
acknowledges that the Company has no obligation
to provide for any Renewal Term or to
continue the Employee’s employment after
expiration of the Initial Term or any then
current Renewal Term,
and the Employee expressly acknowledges that no
promises or understandings to the
contrary have been made or
reached.




 






2. Duties and Responsibilities
.




 






(a) During the Term,
the Employee agrees to
perform the Employee’s exclusive services for
the Company and its affiliates, as applicable,
upon the terms and conditions of
this Agreement.  The Employee shall
render the Employee’s services hereunder
as Chief Financial Officer, reporting to
the Company’s Chief Executive Officer. 
The Employee shall have the duties, responsibilities and
authority as are determined
from time to time by the Company and
the Employee shall
perform the services requested
from time to
time by the Company commensurate with the Employee’s status and
consistent with the Employee’s position
as in




 
 




 


effect from time to
time hereunder.
 






(b) During the Term,
the Employee acknowledges that
the Employee’s duties and responsibilities shall require the Employee to
travel on business to the extent necessary to
fully perform the Employee’s duties hereunder.




 






(c) During the Term,
the Employee shall devote all of
the Employee’s business time, energy and
skill to the business of the Company and
its affiliates and the performance of
the Employee’s duties hereunder, and
shall use the Employee’s best
efforts to
faithfully and diligently serve the Company and
its affiliates. During the Term,
the Employee shall not, without
the prior written consent of
the Company, engage in any other business,
profession or occupation, whether or not pursued for
gain, profit or other pecuniary advantage, and shall
not accept employment with, or
provide services as a consultant or in
any other capacity for, any person or
entity other than the Company and
its affiliates;  provided ,  however ,
that the Employee shall be permitted to
participate in
such charitable and community related
services as the Employee may choose, which do
not, singularly or in the aggregate, conflict or
interfere with the Employee’s duties hereunder and
are not in conflict with the interests of
the Company and its affiliates or
violate Section 6 or 7.




 






3. Compensation and Related Matters
.




 






(a) Base Salary . During the Term, for
all services rendered
under this Agreement, the Company shall
pay the Employee a base salary (“
Base Salary ”), payable in
accordance with the Company’s applicable payroll practices, at
an annual rate of $300,000,
which base salary shall thereafter
be subject to
annual review and increase (but not decrease)
at the discretion of the board of directors of
the Company (the “ Board
”).  References in this Agreement to
“Base Salary” shall be deemed to refer to
the most recently effective annual
base salary rate.




 






(b) Incentive Compensation . With respect to the 2015
calendar year and each subsequent full calendar year
during the Term (each,  a “
Bonus Year ”), the Employee shall
be eligible to earn an annual bonus award
(the “ Annual Bonus ”) of up to
eighty percent (80%) of Base Salary, based upon and
subject to the achievement of
performance goals, which goals shall be established
in good faith
by the compensation committee of the Board within the first
three months of each Bonus Year
during the Term.    With respect to the
2015 calendar year, the Annual Bonus shall
be calculated on a prorated basis based upon
the amount of Base Salary paid through December
31, 2015. The Annual Bonus, if any, shall
be paid
to the Employee during the calendar year immediately following the relevant Bonus Year
following the Company’s receipt of
the final audited financial statements from
the Company’s accounting firm in respect
of the relevant Bonus Year, but not
later than March 15th of such calendar year or
such later
date on which bonuses are paid to
other senior executives of
the Company generally; provided
that the Employee is employed by the Company on
December 31 of the applicable Bonus Year. 
None of the bonuses provided for under this
Section 3(b) are guaranteed bonuses or
any other
form of guaranteed compensation.





 






(c)
Benefits and Perquisites .  During the Term,
the Employee shall
be provided, in accordance with
the terms of
the Company’s employee benefit
plans as in effect from time to time,
with employee benefits and perquisites on
the same basis
as those benefits are generally made available to
other senior executives of
the Company.




 




2





 








(d) Expense Reimbursements . During the Term,
the Company shall reimburse the Employee for
the Employee’s reasonable and
necessary business expenses in
accordance with its then
prevailing policy for
senior executives (which shall include appropriate itemization
and substantiation of
expenses incurred).




 






4. Termination of Services; Obligations Upon
Termination .




 






(a) Generally .
 The Employee’s employment
may be terminated by either party at
any time and for any reason, and without
any advance notice;  provided , 
however , that the Employee shall
be required to give the Company at least six
(6) weeks’ advance written notice of
any voluntary termination
of the Employee’s employment (which, for
the avoidance of doubt, shall not
include a termination of
employment by the Employee for Good
Reason).  Following any termination
of the Employee’s employment with
the Company and its affiliates,
as applicable, hereunder,
notwithstanding any provision to
the contrary in
this Agreement, the obligations of the Company to
pay or
provide the Employee with compensation and
benefits under Section 3 shall cease,
and except as otherwise expressly provided in
this Section 4, the Company shall have no
further obligations to
the Employee hereunder except (i) payment (within thirty (30)
days following the date of the termination of
the Employee’s employment hereunder) of any
Base Salary accrued through the date of
termination, to
the extent unpaid, (ii) except in
the case of termination
of the Employee’s employment
by the Company for Cause, payment of
any Annual Bonus earned for the Bonus Year
prior to the year in which the date of
termination of employment occurs, to
the extent unpaid, such payment to
be made in accordance with Section 3(b),
(iii) reimbursement of any unreimbursed
business expenses properly incurred by the Employee prior
to the date of termination of employment in
accordance with Company policy and (iv)
as set forth in any benefit plans, programs or
arrangements in
which the Employee participates (the amounts described
in clauses (i) through (iv), as applicable,
of this Section 4(a) being referred to
herein as the “ Accrued Rights
”).




 






(b) Termination
by the Company Without Cause (Other Than
Due to Disability or   Death) or
by the Employee for Good Reason
.




 






(i) If
the Employee’s employment with
the Company and its affiliates, as applicable,
hereunder is terminated
by (A) the Company for any reason other
than (1) Cause, (2) Disability or (3)
the Employee’s death or (B)
the Employee for Good Reason, then in
addition to the Accrued Rights, subject to
the Employee’s continued compliance with Sections 6
and 7 and the Employee’s execution and
delivery of a general release of claims against
the Company and its affiliates in
substantially the form attached as  Exhibit
 B  hereto (the “ Release
”), on or after the date of
Employee’s termination of employment and
not later than the sixtieth (60th) day following the date of the Employee’s termination
of employment and his non-revocation of
such Release within the time period provided therein, the Company shall
pay the Employee (x) an amount equal
to the Annual Bonus, if any, earned for
the Bonus Year in which the date of termination
of employment occurs,
which bonus would otherwise be payable to
the Employee if his employment had not
terminated (as determined
following the end of such Bonus Year
based on the actual full-year performance of
the Company in such Bonus Year),
multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of
which is the number of days
the Employee was employed hereunder
in such year and the 





 




3





 


denominator of which is 365 (to
the extent applicable, the “
Pro-Rata Bonus ”), which
amount is payable in accordance with Section
3(b), (y) an amount equal to the sum of
(I) the Employee’s Base Salary at
the rate in effect
on the date of termination and (II) the
amount of the Employee’s Annual Bonus, if
any, earned (regardless of whether paid), in respect of
the Bonus Year
immediately preceding the year of
termination (the “ Severance Amount
”), which Severance Amount
is payable in equal installments in
accordance with
the Company’s usual payment practices over
 a twelve (12) month period commencing on
the day immediately following the date of termination (such period,
the “ Severance Period ”) and (z) an
amount equal to one and a half
(1.5) times the Company’s cost of
providing, for the Severance Period, coverage for
the Employee and his dependents under
the Company’s group health plan(s) at
the applicable premium rate in effect
at the time of
the Employee’s termination
of employment, which amount is payable in
equal installments in
accordance with the Company’s usual
payment practices over the Severance Period.
   Notwithstanding the foregoing,
the Company shall have the right to
cease making such payments and
the Employee shall be obligated to
repay any such amounts to
the Company already paid if
the Employee fails to execute and
deliver the Release within the time period
provided above or, after timely delivery,
the Employee revokes it
within the time period specified in
such Release.
 






(ii) For
purposes of
this Agreement, “Cause” means:




 






(A) the Employee’s willful and
continued failure to
perform the Employee’s material,
reasonable and lawful duties (other
than as a result of
incapacity due to physical or
mental illness);  provided that
, the Employee does not
cure such failure within 15 days after
receipt from the Company of written
notice of such failure;




 






(B) the Employee’s negligence or
willful misconduct in
the course of the Employee’s employment with
the Company and its affiliates,
as applicable, that the Board in good
faith in its reasonable discretion
determines has a material, demonstrable and
adverse effect on the Company and
its affiliates, provided that, 
to the extent curable, the Employee does not cure such negligence or
misconduct within 15 days after receipt
from the Company of written notice of
such action;




 






(C) the Employee’s indictment of,
conviction of, or plea of  nolo  
contendere  to
(1) a misdemeanor involving moral
turpitude or (2) a felony (or
the equivalent of a misdemeanor or felony in
a jurisdiction other than
the United States);




 






(D) the Employee’s material breach of
this Agreement, including, without limitation the provisions of
Sections 6 and 7,  provided that , to
the extent curable, the Employee does not
cure such breach within 15 days after receipt
from the Company of written notice of
such breach;




 






(E) the Employee’s violation of
lawful Company policies that the Board in
good faith in
its reasonable discretion determines has a material, demonstrable and adverse effect
on the Company and its affiliates, provided
that,  to the extent curable, the
Employee does not
cure such violation within 15 days after
receipt from the Company of
written notice of such violation;








4





 








(F) the Employee’s misappropriation, embezzlement
or material misuse of funds or
property belonging to the Company or any of
its affiliates; or




 






(G) the Employee’s use of alcohol or
drugs that
either materially interferes with the performance of the Employee’s duties hereunder
or adversely affects the integrity or
reputation of the Company or its affiliates,
their employees or their
products or services, as determined
by the Board in good faith
in its reasonable discretion.




 






(iii) For
purposes of this Agreement, “Good
Reason” means, without the Employee’s written
consent:




 






(A) a material diminution
by the Company in
the Employee’s duties, authority or
responsibilities; opportunity;




 






(B)
a reduction in
the Employee’s Base Salary or annual
bonus




 






(C) a material breach
by the Company of
this Agreement;




 






(D) a requirement that
the Employee relocate his principal place of employment
to a location more than
thirty miles from the location where the Employee is then principally providing
services; or




 






(E) the Sale of the Company (as defined
below) to any person or entity if such person or
entity fails or refuses to assume, in
writing or by operation of law,
all obligations under this Agreement at or
prior to the time of such sale;




 
provided that,
notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the foregoing,
the Employee shall only have “Good
Reason” to
terminate employment pursuant to
subsection (A), (B) or (C)
following the Company’s failure to
remedy the act or omission which is alleged to
constitute “Good
Reason” within fifteen (15) days
following the Company’s receipt of
written notice from the Employee specifying
such act or omission.
 






(iv) For
purposes of
this Agreement, “Sale of the Company” means,
following the Effective Date, the consummation
of a transaction, whether in
a single transaction or in a series of
related transactions, with any other person or
persons on an arm’s-length basis, pursuant to
which such party or parties (a)
acquire (whether by merger, stock purchase,
recapitalization, reorganization, redemption, issuance of
capital stock or otherwise) more than 50% of
the fully diluted units or voting stock of
the Company or PGA Holdings, Inc. (“
PGA Holdings ”) or





 






(v) acquire assets constituting all or
substantially all of the assets of
PGA Holdings and its subsidiaries on
a consolidated basis, except for
any transaction with  a wholly owned
subsidiary of
Vestar Capital Partners V, L.P. or
a dissolution of the Company or
PGA Holdings pursuant
to the Company’s or
PGA Holdings’ Articles of Incorporation (other
than transactions effected
for the purpose of
changing the form of organization of PGA
Holdings or any of its subsidiaries). For
purposes of
this Agreement, the Employee shall
be deemed to have a “Disability” if
the Employee would be entitled to
long-term disability benefits under
the Company’s long-term disability plan
as in effect from time to
time, without regard to any waiting or
elimination period under such plan
and assuming for such purpose that
the Employee is actually 




 




5





 


participating in such plan
at such time.  If
the Company does not
maintain a long-term disability plan at
the time of the Employee’s termination of
employment, “Disability” shall mean the Employee’s inability to
perform the Employee’s duties and
responsibilities hereunder due to physical or
mental illness that is expected to last
for at least 6 months.  
 Any question as to the existence of
the Disability of the Employee as to
which the Company and the Employee shall
not agree shall be determined in
writing by a qualified independent physician mutually acceptable to the Employee and
the Company (and if the Employee and
the Company cannot agree as to
a qualified independent physician, each shall
appoint a physician and
those two physicians shall select a third
physician who shall make such determination
in
writing, which shall be final and conclusive for
all purposes of this Agreement).    In
connection
therewith, the Employee agrees to submit
to any medical examination(s)
as may be requested and paid for
by the Company for such purpose.
 






(c) Termination on Account of Disability or Death. If the
Employee’s employment with the Company and
its affiliates,
as applicable, hereunder is terminated on
account of a Disability or as a result
of the Employee’s death, then in
addition to the Accrued Rights,
the Employee (or
the Employee’s estate, as
the case may be) shall be entitled to
receive from the Company the Pro
Rata Bonus, if any, for the year in
which termination of employment occurs, which
amount is payable in accordance with Section
3(b).  Any termination
by the Company for Disability shall
be communicated by written notice in
accordance with Section 20.




 






(d) Termination by the Company for Cause;
Voluntary Resignation .
  For the avoidance of doubt, if
the Employee’s employment with
the Company and its affiliates, as applicable,
hereunder is terminated by the Company for
Cause, or by the Employee (other than for Good
Reason or as a result of Disability or death),
the Employee shall not be entitled
to any compensation or benefits other
than the Accrued Rights.    Any
voluntary termination of employment by the Employee that
occurs during one of
the cure periods referenced in
Section 4(b)(ii) hereof shall be deemed to
be a termination of
the Employee’s employment by the Company for
Cause. Any termination by the Company for
Cause, or voluntary resignation
by the Employee, shall be communicated
by written
notice in accordance with Section 20 (and, in
the case of
the Employee’s voluntary resignation, in
accordance with Section 4(a)).




 






(e) Failure to Renew . In
the event either party elects not to
extend the Initial Term or any Renewal
Term, as applicable, pursuant to Section 1,
unless the Employee’s employment
is earlier terminated pursuant to paragraph (a), (b), (c)
or (d) of this Section 4, the termination
of this Agreement (whether or
not the Employee continues as an employee of
the Company thereafter) shall be deemed to occur on
the close of business on
the day immediately preceding the Expiration Date or the
next scheduled anniversary of the Expiration
Date, as applicable,
and the Employee shall be entitled to
receive the Accrued Rights. In addition,
if the election not to extend
the Initial Term or any Renewal
Term is made by the Company,
the termination
of this Agreement shall be deemed
 a termination of
the Employee’s employment for a reason other
than Cause, Disability or death, and
the Employee shall be entitled to
receive the payments and
benefits described in Section 4(b)(i), subject to
the timing and other
requirements set forth therein and in Section
24.




 






(f) Additional Payment Provisions
.  The payment of
any amounts accrued under any benefit
plan, program or arrangement in which
the Employee participates shall be subject to
the 




 




6





 


terms of the applicable plan,
program or arrangement,
and any elections the Employee has made thereunder.
 






(g) Transition .  Upon request of the Company,
the Employee shall
actively work with the Company during the six
(6)-week period following notification
to the Company of
the Employee’s intent to terminate employment
hereunder to
recruit the Employee’s successor
and shall
perform such other duties as may reasonably be required
by the Company to assist in
the transition process.




 






5. Acknowledgments .




 






(a) The Employee acknowledges that
the Company and
its affiliates have expended and
shall continue to
expend substantial amounts of time, money and
effort to develop business strategies,
customer relationships, employee relationships and
goodwill and build an effective organization.
 The Employee acknowledges that
during the Term, the Employee shall become familiar with the Company’s and
its affiliates’ Confidential Information
(as defined in Section 6(a)) and that
during the Term the Employee shall have access to
such Confidential Information.




 






(b) The Employee acknowledges that
the Company and
its affiliates have a legitimate business interest
and right in
protecting the Confidential Information, goodwill, employee and customer
relationships, and that the Company and
its affiliates would
be seriously damaged by the disclosure of
Confidential Information and the loss or
deterioration of its customer
and employee relationships. The Employee further
acknowledges that the Company is entitled
to protect and preserve the going concern
value of the Company and its affiliates to
the extent permitted by law.




 






(c) The Employee agrees that
the covenants contained in this Agreement
are reasonable and appropriate in light of
the cash and non-cash consideration paid and to
be paid, and
the equity investment opportunities made and
to be made available, by the Company and
its affiliates, and to
be received by the Employee, under
this Agreement and
other agreements entered into and to
be entered into with the Company and
its affiliates. The Employee further acknowledges that,
notwithstanding the Employee’s compliance with the covenants contained
in this Agreement and other agreements entered
into and to be entered into with
the Company and its affiliates,
the Employee has other opportunities to
earn a livelihood and
adequate means of support for
the Employee and his dependents.




 






6. Confidentiality .




 






(a) The Employee agrees that all
Confidential Information is a valuable, special
and unique asset of
PG Holdco, LLC (“ Holdco ”),
the Company and their
respective subsidiaries and affiliates and the Employee agrees that
he will not at any time,
including following the Term, directly or
indirectly, except with the prior written consent of
the Company, use, divulge or disclose or
communicate, or cause any other person or entity to
use, divulge, disclose or communicate, to
any person, firm, corporation or entity, in any manner
whatsoever, any Confidential Information, other than
as necessary for the Employee to
perform his duties and responsibilities to
the Company and its affiliates,
as applicable, as authorized
by the Company and its affiliates,
as applicable;  provided ,  however ,
that the foregoing shall not
apply to Confidential Information that
is required to




 




7





 


be disclosed by a court or
regulatory authority of competent jurisdiction.
   The foregoing covenants shall
apply to each item of information for
so long as it
remains Confidential Information.  For
purposes of
this Agreement, “Confidential Information” means all trade secrets,
proprietary information and
other confidential information of
Holdco, the Company and their
respective subsidiaries and
affiliates, including, without limitation, (i)
their methods, techniques, processes,
research and development, computer programs, and
source codes; (ii) specifications, manuals,
software in various stages of development, and
other technical data; (iii) customers and
prospect lists, details of agreements and
communications with customers and prospects,
and other customer information including, but
not limited, to cost, pricing, reports, analyses or other
client data; (iv)
sales plans and projections, product
pricing information, protocols, acquisition, expansion,
marketing, financial and other
business information and existing and
future products and
business plans and strategies; (v)
sales proposals, demonstrations systems,
sales material; (vi) sources of
products, information, or know-how and purchasing,
operating and
other cost data; (vii) identity of specialized consultants and
contractors and proprietary information developed by them
for the Company; (viii)
employee information (including, but not limited to,
personnel, payroll, compensation and
benefit data and plans); and (ix) other
non-public and patient information furnished to
Holdco, the Company and
their respective subsidiaries and affiliates and all the other
know-how, materials and things pertaining in
any respect to Holdco, the Company and their
respective subsidiaries and affiliates or
clients that are a “trade secret” pursuant to applicable law; 
provided ,  however ,
that “Confidential Information” shall
not include information that is generally known
in the industry or the public or is or
becomes publicly available, in each case,
other than as a result
of the Employee’s breach
of this Agreement.    For
the avoidance of doubt,
Confidential Information also includes Patient
Information.  For purposes of
this Agreement, “Patient Information” means information that
(x) relates to the past, present or
future physical or mental health or condition of
an individual; the provision of
health care to an individual; or
the past, present or future payment for
the provision of health care to
an individual; and (y) either
identifies the individual or reasonably could
be used to
identify the individual (including, without limitation,
the individual’s name and
address; diagnosis and
treatment information, including the identity of
the facility at
which such treatment was rendered; and
the individual’s medical history, records or
charts).  The Employee acknowledges that
the Company and
its affiliates have a duty under
law and by contract to
keep Patient Information strictly confidential and
that unauthorized use or disclosure of
Patient Information
may subject the Company and
its affiliates to substantial fines,
penalties and
damages. The Employee shall comply with such policies and
procedures relating to the protection of
Patient Information and other
Confidential Information as the Company and
its affiliates may implement from time to time, and
shall use reasonable care to avoid
the inadvertent disclosure or dissemination of
any Patient Information or
other Confidential Information.
 






(b) The Employee agrees that upon
termination of
the Employee’s employment with the Company and
its affiliates, as applicable, for any reason,
the Employee will return to
the Company immediately any and all
notes, memoranda, specifications, devices, formulas,
records,files,
lists, drawings, books, plans, documents, information, letters, data, models, equipment, property,
computer, software or intellectual
property relating to Holdco’s,
the Company’s and their
respective subsidiaries’ and
affiliates’ business in whatever
form (including electronic), and all
copies thereof, in any way relating to
the business of Holdco, the Company or
any of their respective subsidiaries or
affiliates. The Employee further agrees that
any property 





 




8





 


situated
on the Company’s premises and
owned by Holdco, the Company or any of
their respective subsidiaries or
affiliates, including disks and other
storage media, filing cabinets or other
work areas, is subject to inspection
by Company personnel at any time with or
without notice. The Employee further
agrees that he will not retain or use for
his account at any time any trade names,
trademark or other
proprietary business designation used or owned in
connection with the business of Holdco,
the Company or any of their
respective subsidiaries or affiliates.
 






(c) The Employee represents and warrants
that he has not disclosed any of
the terms of this Agreement to any person not
a party to, or an attorney for or other
representative of a party to, this Agreement.
   The Employee further
agrees that, until such time when this Agreement
is disclosed
by the Company as a public document, he shall not disclose the terms of this Agreement, except to
the Employee’s immediate family and
the Employee’s financial
and legal advisors, or as may be required
by law or ordered by a court or
regulatory authority of competent jurisdiction, or
as otherwise required herein,  provided
,  however , that
the Employee may disclose to
any prospective employer the provisions of
Sections 5, 6, 7, 9 and 10 hereof.




 






7. Non-Competition; Equitable Relief; Forfeiture of
Severance Benefits .




 






(a) As an inducement to the Company to
enter into this Agreement, and to reduce the cost to
the Company of monitoring and
enforcing compliance with confidentiality obligations contained
in Section 6, the Employee agrees that he will
not, directly or indirectly:




 






(i) own
(except passive ownership of less than 2% of
a publicly traded company), manage, operate,
control, participate in, enter into
employment with, or render services or
assistance of any kind to any business or
organization (other than the Company) which is,
in whole or in part, involved in
a Restricted Area (as defined below) or
undertake activities in
the Restricted Area during the Restricted
Period
(as defined below).  For purposes of this Agreement, “Restricted Area” means
(A) the general area of measurement and
improvement solutions, (B) data analytics and
decision support tools focused on
healthcare quality, and (C) products or
services related
to improvement solutions, educational programs,
or taking any actions on, or publishing or
reporting results in connection with,
the general area of quality and performance,
in all cases described in
the foregoing clauses (A), (B) and (C), to
or about (i) healthcare or
related institutions or employees thereof, or
(ii) medical or
other professionals operating in
the health care industry, anywhere, in
the case of (i) or (ii), in the United
States or any other geographic location in
North America where PGA Holdings or any of
its subsidiaries operates. 
“Restricted Area” also includes (x)
consulting services and solutions relating to
quality and performance improvement in
healthcare or related institutions, or
(y) any other business that PGA Holdings
or any of its subsidiaries is taking or
has taken specific actions in
furtherance of engaging in (so
long as the Employee knew or
reasonably should have known about
such actions);





 






(ii)
solicit or
divert, or assist in soliciting or diverting, (A)
the business that any customer of
the Company or any of
its affiliates conducts or could reasonably be
expected to conduct with the Company or
any of its affiliates (the “ Covered
Business ”) or (B) the Covered Business of
any person or entity in respect of which
the Employee is reasonably aware that the Company or
any of its affiliates has approached or
has made significant plans to approach
as a prospective customer during the Term,
whether on the Employee’s own behalf or on behalf
of or in conjunction with any other person,
firm, corporation
or entity during the Restricted
Period;




 




9





 








(iii) (A) encourage, induce, hire or solicit or
seek to induce, hire or solicit
any person engaged with PGA Holdings or
any of its subsidiaries as an
employee, agent, independent contractor or
otherwise (or any such person that
was so engaged during the one-year
period immediately preceding such initial inducement
or solicitation during the Term)(each,
 a “ Company Employee ”) to end
his or her engagement or employment with
PGA Holdings or any of its subsidiaries or
otherwise to participate in any Restricted
Area during the Restricted Period or (B)
recommend to any person or entity involved in
a Restricted Area that such person or
entity employ or engage such current or
former Company Employee during the Restricted Period;




 






(iv) whether on the Employee’s own behalf
or on behalf of or in conjunction with
any other person, firm,
corporation or entity, (A) solicit (whether
by mail, telephone, personal meeting or
otherwise), encourage or induce any customer,
supplier or client of PGA Holdings or
any of its subsidiaries to
transact business with any business or
organization (other than the Company) involved in
a Restricted Area or reduce or refrain
from doing any business with PGA Holdings or
any of its subsidiaries, (B) interfere with or
damage (or attempt to interfere with or damage)
any relationship between PGA Holdings or any of
its subsidiaries and any of their
respective customers, suppliers or clients (or
any person or entity in respect of
which the Employee is reasonably aware that
PGA Holdings or any of
its subsidiaries has approached or
has made significant plans to
approach as a prospective customer, supplier
or client), or (C) aid or
become associated with other persons or
entities involved in any such acts, in each
case, during the Restricted Period;
or




 






(v) whether in written or oral form, (x)
do any act or
make any statement whatsoever that
may or shall criticize, denigrate, disparage (including,
but not limited to,
by relative comparison), impair, impugn or
negatively reflect upon the name, reputation or
business interests of any of
the&nb







 








 


















Sample Employment Agreement, Employment Agreement Template, Employment Agreement Sample, Employment Contract Sample, Employment Contract Template - Free Employment Agreement Forms (page 1 Of 858)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Employment Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>





An employment agreement is a document which delineates the terms of the relationship between an employer and employee. If you are hiring a new employee, this document can help form a solid foundation for your business relationship. The document will specify expectations for both parties and may include items such as terms of conduct, employee benefits, vacation time, medical leave, hours, and other issues that may be up for consideration, depending on the business' needs.

An employment agreement might also incorporate arbitration conditions, confidentiality terms and non-compete clauses, provided that separate documents do not address these issues. Some employers may include a progressive disciplinary policy section in the agreement, wherein conditions and repercussions for employee misconduct are explained.

Once signed, an employment agreement is a legally binding contract that can be enforced in a court of law. Often an employer or company makes their offer of employment contingent on an employee signing the agreement.        



Employment Agreement, Employment Agreement Template, Employment Agreement Sample, Employment Contract Sample, Employment Contract Template 






These example
  Employment Agreements and Sample Employment Contract are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their
  clients. Use them as Employment Agreement samples, Employment Agreement templates, work contracts, competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about
  transactions within a particular industry or sector.We have millions of online legal documents, contracts and clauses that you can search for free.   See Also:Confidentiality AgreementsEmployee Bonus Plan Agreements




1) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: SOLIS TEK, INC./NV | Solis Tek Inc 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
2) AMENDMENT TO EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: HOMESTREET, INC. | HomeStreet, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 3/16/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Washington
3) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: ADAPTIMMUNE THERAPEUTICS PLC | Adaptimmune Limited | Adaptimmune, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Pennsylvania
4) RETENTION AGREEMENTParties: COLONY BANKCORP INC | Colony Bank 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Georgia
5) FIRST AMENDMENT OF EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: FIRST BANCORP /NC/ | First Bancorp 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017

6) EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: NUSTATE ENERGY HOLDINGS, INC. | NUSTATE ENERGY HOLDINGS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 3/8/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Florida
7) Employment AgreementParties: FIRST FOODS GROUP, INC. | First Food Group, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 3/7/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
8) Form of Equity Award AgreementParties: SCIENTIFIC GAMES CORP | SCIENTIFIC GAMES CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/3/2017

9) GENERAL RELEASE AND COVENANT NOT TO SUEParties: FINISH LINE INC /IN/ | Finish Line, Inc | Running Specialty Group 
								
								Document Date: 3/3/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Indiana
10) Employment AgreementParties: COLUMBUS MCKINNON CORP | COLUMBUS MCKINNON CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
11) RETENTION BONUS POOL RESTRICTED STOCK AWARD AGREEMENT UNDER THE BOSTON PRIVATE FINANCIAL HOLDINGS, INC. 2010 INDUCEMENT STOCK PLANParties: BOSTON PRIVATE FINANCIAL HOLDINGS INC | Boston Private Financial Holdings, Inc | NASDAQ Stock Market, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Massachusetts
12) EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: CEMPRA, INC. | Cempra, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:North Carolina
13) EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: DEL FRISCO'S RESTAURANT GROUP, INC. | Del Frisco's Restaurant Group, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
14) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: NATIONAL STORAGE AFFILIATES TRUST 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Maryland
15) EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: DELEK US HOLDINGS, INC. | DELEK US HOLDINGS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Tennessee
16) AMENDED AND RESTATED EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: WESTINGHOUSE AIR BRAKE TECHNOLOGIES CORP | Faiveley Transport SA | Wabtec Corporation, FW Acquisition LLC | Westinghouse Air Brake Technologies Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
17) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT dated May 3, 2012Parties: AXIS CAPITAL HOLDINGS LTD | AXIS Capital Holdings Limited | AXIS Specialty Limited | AXIS Specialty US Services, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

18) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: STERLING BANCORP | Sterling National Bank 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
19) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: CELSIUS HOLDINGS, INC. | Celsius Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Florida
20) AMENDMENT TO EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: LIFE STORAGE LP | Life Storage, Inc | Sovran Acquisition Limited Partnership | Sovran Self Storage, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

21) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: WASTE CONNECTIONS, INC. | Waste Connections, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
22) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: ZEBRA TECHNOLOGIES CORP | ZEBRA TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Illinois
23) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: ONCOCYTE CORP | OncoCyte Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
24) CALLAWAY GOLF COMPANY OFFICER EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: CALLAWAY GOLF CO | CALLAWAY GOLF COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
25) ADDENDUM TO EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: CELSIUS HOLDINGS, INC. | Celsius Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

26) EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: SOHU COM INC | Changyoucom Limited | Goulston  Storrs, PC 
								Law Firm: Goulston Storrs
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
27) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: CTI BIOPHARMA CORP 
								Law Firm: O'Melveny Myers
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Washington
28) ALLSCRIPTS HEALTHCARE SOLUTIONS, INC. EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: ALLSCRIPTS HEALTHCARE SOLUTIONS, INC. | ALLSCRIPTS HEALTHCARE SOLUTIONS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Illinois
29) SEVERANCE AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASEParties: SOUTHCROSS ENERGY PARTNERS, L.P. | Southcross Energy Partners GP, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
30) EXECUTIVE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: FIESTA RESTAURANT GROUP, INC. | Fiesta Restaurant Group, Inc 
								Law Firm: Hughes Hubbard
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
31) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: AIT THERAPEUTICS, INC. | Advanced Inhalation Therapies (AIT) Inc | Advanced Inhalation Therapies (AIT) Ltd 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
32) AMENDMENT #1 TO EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: DIODES INC /DEL/ | Diodes Incorporated 
								
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
33) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: PHARMERICA CORP | PharMerica Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Kentucky
34) YRC WORLDWIDE INC. RESTRICTED STOCK AGREEMENTParties: YRC WORLDWIDE INC. | YRC WORLDWIDE INC 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

35) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: FEDERATED INVESTORS INC /PA/ | FEDERATED SECURITIES CORP 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Pennsylvania
36) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: KAR AUCTION SERVICES, INC. | KAR Auction Services, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Indiana
37) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: LUMINEX CORP | Luminex Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
38) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: LUMINEX CORP | Luminex Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Texas
39) SIXTH AMENDMENT TO EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: SP PLUS CORP | APCOA's and APCOA/Standard Parking Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

40) AMENDMENT TO EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: KAR AUCTION SERVICES, INC. | KAR Auction Services, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017

41) Retention AgreementParties: ENDURANCE INTERNATIONAL GROUP HOLDINGS, INC. | Constant Contact, Inc | Endurance International Group Holdings, Inc | Holdings, Paintbrush Acquisition Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Massachusetts
42) AMENDED AND RESTATED EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: REDWOOD TRUST INC | Redwood Trust, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
43) CHANGE IN CONTROL EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: HANCOCK HOLDING CO | HANCOCK HOLDING COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Mississippi
44) AMENDED AND RESTATED EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: REDWOOD TRUST INC | Redwood Trust, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
45) AMENDED AND RESTATED EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: REDWOOD TRUST INC | Redwood Trust, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:California
46) AMENDMENT TO EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: INSMED INC | Insmed Incorporated 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

47) AMENDMENT NO. 1 TO EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: XTANT MEDICAL HOLDINGS, INC. | Xtant Medical Holdings, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

48) AMENDMENT TO EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENTParties: INSMED INC | Insmed Incorporated 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

49) EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT (Farmer Bros. Co. / Siers)Parties: FARMER BROTHERS CO | FARMER BROS CO 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

50) Supplement to Employment Agreement October 3, 2016Parties: AUTOLIV INC | Autoliv, Inc 
								
								Document Date: 2/23/2017

 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778798081828384858687888990919293949596979899100101102103104105106107108109110111112113114115116117118119120121122123124125126127128129130131132133134135136137138139140141142143144145146147148149150151152153154155156157158159160161162163164165166167168169170171172173174175176177178179180181182183184185186187188189190191192193194195196197198199200201202203204205206207208209210211212213214215216217218219220221222223224225226227228229230231232233234235236237238239240241242243244245246247248249250251252253254255256257258259260261262263264265266267268269270271272273274275276277278279280281282283284285286287288289290291292293294295296297298299300301302303304305306307308309310311312313314315316317318319320321322323324325326327328329330331332333334335336337338339340341342343344345346347348349350351352353354355356357358359360361362363364365366367368369370371372373374375376377378379380381382383384385386387388389390391392393394395396397398399400401402403404405406407408409410411412413414415416417418419420421422423424425426427428429430431432433434435436437438439440441442443444445446447448449450451452453454455456457458459460461462463464465466467468469470471472473474475476477478479480481482483484485486487488489490491492493494495496497498499500501502503504505506507508509510511512513514515516517518519520521522523524525526527528529530531532533534535536537538539540541542543544545546547548549550551552553554555556557558559560561562563564565566567568569570571572573574575576577578579580581582583584585586587588589590591592593594595596597598599600601602603604605606607608609610611612613614615616617618619620621622623624625626627628629630631632633634635636637638639640641642643644645646647648649650651652653654655656657658659660661662663664665666667668669670671672673674675676677678679680681682683684685686687688689690691692693694695696697698699700701702703704705706707708709710711712713714715716717718719720721722723724725726727728729730731732733734735736737738739740741742743744745746747748749750751752753754755756757758759760761762763764765766767768769770771772773774775776777778779780781782783784785786787788789790791792793794795796797798799800801802803804805806807808809810811812813814815816817818819820821822823824825826827828829830831832833834835836837838839840841842843844845846847848849850851852853854855856857858 
 
 

 















403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.























































 


   Breht Feigh | Press Ganey Associates Inc | ZoomInfo.com








MOTION to Dismiss filed by Mark W. Vargo, Breht T. Feigh, American Dental Partners, Inc., Gregory A. Serrano. After hearing, the motion to dismiss is DENIED by the court in an oral ruling. The court notes that the PSLRA does not alter the standard to be applied on a motion to dismiss; while a plaintiff must show a strong inference of scienter, all inferences are nonetheless drawn in plaintiff's favor. Aldridge v. A.T. Cross Corp., 284 F.3d 72, 78 (1st Cir. 2002). The court finds that as pled, defendants' public disclosures of ongoing litigation were not predictions, but were misrepresentations concealing adverse facts then known to defendants. In re Credit Suisse First Boston Corp., 431 F.3d 36, 47 (1st Cir. 2005). The court further notes the impact of Tellabs, Inc. v. Makor Issues & Rights, Ltd., 551 U.S. 308 (2007), on the import of equally compelling inferences. The court finds all other elements of a Section 10(b) and Rule 10b-5 action to be adequately pled. Dura Pharm., Inc. v. Broudo, 544 U.S. 336 (2005). Finally, the court notes that scienter need not be pled under the rigorous standards of the PSLRA to state a claim under Section 20(a). In re Stone & Webster, Inc. Sec. Litig., 414 F.3d 187, 194 (1st Cir. 2005). The parties shall file a joint proposed discovery order within 20 days of today's date. SO ORDERED. (Court Reporter: J. Gibbons.)(Attorneys present: Ta, McIntyre (for plaintiff); Donovan, Ropple (for defendants)) (RGS, law2) (Entered: 04/02/2009) Docket Item 35 | United States Courts Archive











You're viewing Docket Item 35 from the case MOTION to Dismiss filed by Mark W. Vargo, Breht T. Feigh, American Dental Partners, Inc., Gregory A. Serrano. After hearing, the motion to dismiss is DENIED by the court in an oral ruling. The court notes that the PSLRA does not alter the standard to be applied on a motion to dismiss; while a plaintiff must show a strong inference of scienter, all inferences are nonetheless drawn in plaintiff's favor. Aldridge v. A.T. Cross Corp., 284 F.3d 72, 78 (1st Cir. 2002). The court finds that as pled, defendants' public disclosures of ongoing litigation were not predictions, but were misrepresentations concealing adverse facts then known to defendants. In re Credit Suisse First Boston Corp., 431 F.3d 36, 47 (1st Cir. 2005). The court further notes the impact of Tellabs, Inc. v. Makor Issues & Rights, Ltd., 551 U.S. 308 (2007), on the import of equally compelling inferences. The court finds all other elements of a Section 10(b) and Rule 10b-5 action to be adequately pled. Dura Pharm., Inc. v. Broudo, 544 U.S. 336 (2005). Finally, the court notes that scienter need not be pled under the rigorous standards of the PSLRA to state a claim under Section 20(a). In re Stone & Webster, Inc. Sec. Litig., 414 F.3d 187, 194 (1st Cir. 2005). The parties shall file a joint proposed discovery order within 20 days of today's date. SO ORDERED. (Court Reporter: J. Gibbons.)(Attorneys present: Ta, McIntyre (for plaintiff); Donovan, Ropple (for defendants)) (RGS, law2) (Entered: 04/02/2009). View the full docket and case details.
Download this document: 




























View plain text
Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 1 of 26

UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT 

DISTRICT OF MASSACHUSETTS 



IN RE AMERICAN DENTAL PARTNERS, INC. 
SECURITIES LITIGATION 







No. 08-cv-10119-RGS 
(Consolidated Action) 



MEMORANDUM OF LAW IN SUPPORT OF 

MOTION FOR PRELIMINARY CLASS CERTIFICATION, PRELIMINARY 

APPROVAL OF PROPOSED SETTLEMENT, APPROVAL OF FORM 

AND MANNER OF NOTICE, AND SETTING OF FINAL FAIRNESS HEARING 










GRANT & EISENHOFER P.A. 
Stuart M. Grant (BBO # 549471) 
Megan D. McIntyre (pro hac vice) 
Hung G. Ta (pro hac vice) 
1201 North Market Street 
Wilmington, DE 19801 

Counsel for Lead Plaintiff Operating 
Engineers Construction Industry and 
Miscellaneous Pension Fund and Class 
Counsel for the Class 











Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 2 of 26



TABLE OF CONTENTS 

Page 


INTRODUCTION .............................................................................................................. 1 

TABLE OF AUTHORITIES .......................................................................................................... ii 

I. 

II. 


STATEMENT OF FACTS ................................................................................................. 2 

Lead Plaintiff’s Claims ................................................................................................. 2 

A. 






I. 



II. 
















B. 

The Action .................................................................................................................... 4 

C. Mediation and the Proposed Settlement ....................................................................... 5 

THE COURT SHOULD GRANT PRELIMINARY APPROVAL OF THE 
SETTLEMENT BECAUSE IT IS WITHIN THE RANGE OF VALUE 
WARRANTING APPROVAL ........................................................................................... 6 

THE COURT SHOULD PRELIMINARILY CERTIFY THE CLASS............................. 9 

A. 

The Prerequisites Of Rule 23(a) Are Satisfied ........................................................... 10 

1. The Settlement Class Is Sufficiently Numerous ................................................... 10 

2. There Are Common Questions Of Law And Fact ................................................ 11 

3. The Class Representatives’ Claims Are Typical Of Those Of The 


Settlement Class.................................................................................................... 12 

4. Lead Plaintiff And Class Counsel Will Fairly And Adequately Protect The 


Interest Of The Class ............................................................................................ 13 

B. 

The Class’s Claims Satisfy The Prerequisites Of Rule 23(b)(3) ................................ 14 

1. Common Legal And Factual Questions Predominate........................................... 14 

2. A Class Action Is Superior To Other Methods Of Adjudication.......................... 15 

THE FORM AND CONTENT OF THE PROPOSED NOTICE TO THE 
CLASS ARE SUFFICIENT ............................................................................................. 16 


III. 


CONCLUSION............................................................................................................................. 20 


i 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 3 of 26




CASES 

TABLE OF AUTHORITIES 

Page(s) 

Abelson v. Strong, 

MDL No. 584, Civ. A. No. 85-0592-S, 1987 WL 15872 (D. Mass. July 30, 1987) ...............13 

Adams v. Amplidyne, Inc., 

No. 99-cv-4468, 2001 WL 34885324 (D.N.J. Aug. 15, 2001) ................................................18 

Amchem Prods., Inc. v. Windsor, 

521 U.S. 591 (1997).................................................................................................................15 

City P’ship Co. v. Atlantic Acquisition L.P., 

100 F.3d 1041 (1st Cir. 1996)....................................................................................................8 

In re Community Bank of Northern Va., 

418 F.3d 277 (3d Cir. 2005).....................................................................................................10 

Durett v. Housing Authority of City of Providence, 

896 F.2d 600 (1st Cir. 1990)....................................................................................................16 

Fidel v. Farley, 

534 F.3d 508 (6th Cir. 2008) ...................................................................................................18 

In re General Motors Corp. Pick-Up Truck Fuel Tank Prod. Liab. Litig., 

55 F.3d 768 (3rd Cir. 1995) .......................................................................................................6 

In re Gilat Satellite Networks, Ltd., 

2007 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 29062 (E.D.N.Y. Apr. 19, 2007) .........................................................7 

Hawkins v. Commissioner of N.H. Dept. of Health and Human Services, 

2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 807 (D.N.H. Jan. 23, 2004)..................................................................9 

Hotel Holiday Inn de Isla Verde v. N.L.R.B., 

723 F.2d 169 (1st Cir. 1983)......................................................................................................6 

In re Indep. Energy Holdings PLC Sec. Litig., 

2003 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17090 (S.D.N.Y. Sept. 26, 2003).........................................................8 

Kinney v. Metro Global Media, Inc., 

No. Civ. A. 99-579 ML, 2002 WL 31015604 (D.R.I. Aug. 22, 2002)....................................11 

Kirby v. Cullinet Software, Inc., 

116 F.R.D. 303 (D. Mass. 1987)..............................................................................................12 

In re Livent, Inc. Noteholders Sec. Litig., 

210 F.R.D. 512 (S.D.N.Y. 2002) .............................................................................................14 

ii 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 4 of 26



In re Lupron Mktg. & Sales Practices Litig., 

228 F.R.D. 75 (D. Mass. 2005)..................................................................................................6 

In re Lupron Mktg. & Sales Practices Litig., 

345 F. Supp. 2d 135 (D. Mass. 2004) ........................................................................................7 

Priest v. Zayre Corp., 

118 F.R.D. 552 (D. Mass. 1988)..............................................................................................13 

In re Prudential Ins. Co. of Am. Sales Practices Litig., 

177 F.R.D. 216 (D.N.J. 1997)..................................................................................................17 

Randle v. Spectran, 

129 F.R.D. 386 (D. Mass. 1988)..............................................................................................15 

In re Relafen Antitrust Litig., 

231 F.R.D. 52 (D. Mass. 2005)..................................................................................................7 

Rolland v. Celluci, 

191 F.R.D. 3 (D. Mass. 2000)....................................................................................................8 

Swack v. Credit Suisse First Boston, 

230 F.R.D. 250 (D. Mass. 2005)....................................................................................7, 13, 16 

In re Transkaryotic Therapies, Inc. Sec. Litig., 

No. Civ.A.03-10165-RWZ, 2005 WL 3178162 (D. Mass. Nov. 28, 2005) .................... passim 

In re Warner Chilcott Ltd. Sec. Litig., 

No. 06-cv-11515, 2008 WL 5110904 (S.D.N.Y. Nov. 20, 2008)............................................18 

In re Warner Commc’ns Sec. Litig., 

618 F. Supp. 735 (S.D.N.Y. 1985).............................................................................................6 

In re Wireless Facilities, Inc. Sec. Litig. II, 

253 F.R.D. 607 (S.D. Cal. 2008) .............................................................................................18 

STATUTES 

15 U.S.C. § 78u-4(a)(7) .................................................................................................................18 

OTHER AUTHORITIES 

9(b) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure...................................................................................4 

12(b) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.................................................................................4 

23(a) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure ...................................................................... passim 

23(b) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure...................................................................10, 14, 15 

iii 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 5 of 26



23(c)(2)(B) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure ...............................................................16, 17 

23(e)(1) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure...........................................................................16 

MANUAL FOR COMPLEX LITIGATION, Fourth § 13.14......................................................................7 

NEWBERG ON CLASS ACTIONS, 2 Newberg & Conte § 11.41..........................................................6

iv 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 6 of 26



I. 

INTRODUCTION 

Lead Plaintiff, Operating Engineers Construction Industry and Miscellaneous Pension 

Fund, on behalf of the Class (as defined herein), and through Class Counsel, Grant & Eisenhofer 

P.A., submits this application for preliminary approval of a proposed settlement (the 

“Settlement”) of this action (the “Action”) with defendants American Dental Partners, Inc. 

(“ADPI”), Gregory A. Serrao (“Serrao”), Breht T. Feigh (“Feigh”) and Mark W. Vargo 

(“Vargo”) (collectively, the “Defendants,” and together with Lead Plaintiff, the “Settling 

Parties”). The terms of the Settlement are set forth in the Class Action Settlement Agreement 

dated as of December 15, 2009 (“Settlement Agreement”) which is being filed concurrently with 

this motion.1 Under the Settlement, Defendants will cause their directors’ and officers’ liability 

insurance carrier to pay $6,000,000 (six million dollars) in cash to the Class, in return for 

complete and unconditional releases and discharges from all of the Released Claims, as defined 

in the Settlement Agreement. 

Lead Plaintiff respectfully submits that preliminary approval of the Settlement is 

appropriate. The Settlement was reached after a mediation in September 2009, conducted by the 

Honorable Nicholas Politan, and represents the product of good faith, arm’s-length negotiations 

among experienced securities counsel for the Settling Parties. In entering into the Settlement, the 

Settling Parties are fully conversant with the strengths and weaknesses of this Action, having 

briefed a motion by Defendants to dismiss the claims asserted by Lead Plaintiff, and having 

embarked on discovery. Being thus well-positioned to evaluate the risks of continued litigation 

versus the fairness and prudence of a resolution at this time, each of the Settling Parties believes 

the Settlement produces a fair and reasonable result. For these reasons, which are set forth more 

1 
ascribed to the terms in the Settlement Agreement. 

Unless otherwise specified, defined terms used in this memorandum of law shall have the same meaning as 



Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 7 of 26



fully below, the Settlement meets the test for preliminary approval in that it is fair, reasonable 

and adequate. 

Accordingly, Lead Plaintiff requests that the Court enter an order, in the form of the 

accompanying proposed Order of Preliminary Approval: (1) preliminarily certifying the Class; 

(2) granting preliminary approval of the proposed Settlement; (3) approving the Settling Parties’ 

proposed form and method of giving notice to the Class of the pendency of this litigation and of 

the Settlement; (4) directing that notice be given to the putative Class members as approved by 

the Court; and (5) scheduling a fairness hearing during which the Court will consider (a) the 

Settling Parties’ request for final approval of the Settlement, the Plan of Allocation, and entry of 

the proposed Final Order and Judgment, (b) Class Counsel’s application for an award of 

attorneys’ fees and reimbursement of expenses, and (c) dismissal of the Action pending before 

this Court. Defendants consent to this motion. 

II. 

STATEMENT OF FACTS 

A. 

Lead Plaintiff’s Claims 

This is a securities fraud class action brought by Lead Plaintiff on behalf of a class (the 

“Class”) consisting of all persons who purchased or acquired stock of ADPI during the period 

from February 25, 2004 to December 13, 2007 (the “Class Period”). Lead Plaintiff asserts 

claims under Sections 10(b) and 20(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the “Exchange 

Act”) against defendants ADPI, Serrao (at all relevant times the Chairman, President and Chief 

Executive Officer of ADPI), Feigh (at all relevant times the Executive Vice President, Chief 

Financial Officer and Treasurer of ADPI), and Vargo (at all relevant times the Vice President 

and Chief Accounting Officer of ADPI). 

As alleged in Lead Plaintiff’s Consolidated Class Action Complaint dated September 29, 

2008 (the “Complaint”), ADPI was founded in 1995 as a “management service organization,” a 

2 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 8 of 26



company that affiliates with and provides management and administrative support services to 

dental practices. In 1996, PDHC, Ltd. (“PDHC”), a wholly-owned subsidiary of ADPI, entered 

into an affiliation agreement (the “Service Agreement”) with PDG, P.A. (“PDG”), a professional 

association of dentists who practiced dentistry in the Minneapolis-St. Paul region of Minnesota 

under the business name “Park Dental.” 

Lead Plaintiff alleges that, commencing in 2002, ADPI and its subsidiary PDHC began 

engaging in conduct that violated the Service Agreement with PDG. The alleged purpose of this 

conduct was to allow ADPI to extract, and report to investors, increased revenue and earnings 

from the Service Agreement. Lead Plaintiff alleges that ADPI was able to divert to itself 

significant sums of money that should have been paid to PDG under the Service Agreement, as 

well as implement various impermissible cost-cutting measures in violation of the Service 

Agreement, thereby painting a picture of profitability that was false. In ADPI’s SEC filings and 

various other public statements, Defendants allegedly attributed (falsely) ADPI’s newly 

improved financial performance to the success of its business and other reasons. 

PDG eventually commenced a lawsuit in February 2006 (initially against PDHC, and 

later also against ADPI) in Minnesota state court (the “PDG Lawsuit”), arising from the various 

violations described above. In response to this lawsuit, Defendants are alleged to have issued 

further misleading statements in ADPI’s SEC filings, press releases and during conference calls, 

that PDG’s claims were “without merit” and “baseless,” and that ADPI had always conducted its 

business towards PDG in the same way. Lead Plaintiff alleges that Defendants made these 

misstatements despite knowing that ADPI had indeed violated the terms of the Service 

Agreement and that ADPI faced significant liability with respect to PDG’s claims. 

3 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 9 of 26



Lead Plaintiff further alleges that, in March 2007, when PDG gave notice of its intention 

to terminate the Service Agreement, Defendants misled ADPI’s investors by assuring the public 

markets that ADPI would be able to replace the PDG dentists with new dentists and that ADPI 

would continue to operate the Park Dental clinics without PDG. The Complaint alleges that 

Defendants in fact knew ADPI had no workable solution, and that ADPI’s only plan involved 

improper conduct that subjected ADPI to even greater legal liability. 

B. 

The Action 

In March 2008, a number of putative securities class action lawsuits were filed against 

ADPI. By order dated May 29, 2008, this Court consolidated those actions into the present 

Action, appointed Lead Plaintiff to serve as lead plaintiff for the putative class under the Private 

Securities Litigation Reform Act, and appointed Lead Plaintiff’s counsel, the law firm of Grant 

& Eisenhofer P.A., to serve as Lead Counsel for the putative class. 

On September 29, 2008, after an extensive investigation that included review of 

testimony and evidence from the PDG Lawsuit, Lead Plaintiff filed the Complaint. The 

Complaint asserts a claim under Section 10(b) of the Exchange Act against all Defendants, and a 

claim under Section 20(a) of the Exchange Act alleging control person liability against 

Defendants Serrao, Feigh and Vargo. 

On December 5, 2008, Defendants moved to dismiss the Complaint under Rules 9(b) and 

12(b) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, contending that the Complaint failed to state a 

claim and failed to allege fraud with particularity. After full briefing and oral argument, the 

Court denied Defendants’ motion to dismiss in its entirety. 

On April 22, 2009, the parties submitted to the Court a Joint Statement Pursuant to Local 

Rule 16.1(d). In the Joint Statement, the parties informed the Court that they were unable to 

reach agreement on a joint discovery plan because Defendants sought to bifurcate discovery with 

4 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 10 of 26



respect to class certification issues and discovery on the merits. The Court scheduled a status 

conference for June 5, 2009, at which it denied Defendants’ request to bifurcate discovery. The 

parties thereafter commenced exchanging discovery and serving subpoenas seeking relevant 

documents from third parties. 

C. Mediation and the Proposed Settlement 

On September 22, 2009, during the course of discovery, the Settling Parties conducted a 

mediation in an effort to resolve the Action. The Honorable Nicholas Politan served as the 

mediator. While the mediation session itself did not produce a settlement agreement, the parties 

kept the lines of communication open and, with Judge Politan’s able assistance, were able to 

come to an agreement-in-principle on a settlement. The terms of that settlement have been 

formalized in the Settlement Agreement. 

Under the Settlement, Defendants’ insurance carrier shall pay $6,000,000 to the Class, in 

consideration for the Class providing the Defendants with a complete and unconditional release 

and discharge from the Released Claims (as defined in the Settlement Agreement). The 

$6,000,000 shall be deposited into an escrow account for the benefit of the Class no later than 

thirty days after entry of an order preliminarily approving the settlement. The Settlement 

Agreement provides that, at or before the final approval hearing, Class Counsel will propose to 

the Court a Plan of Allocation which shall provide for the manner of allocation of the Settlement 

Fund amongst all Authorized Claimants (terms as defined in the Settlement Agreement). 

The Settlement Agreement and its supporting papers provide for the form and manner of 

class notice, the proof of claim procedures, the procedures for seeking exclusion from the Class 

or objecting to any terms of the Settlement, and the procedure by which Class Counsel shall 

apply for attorneys’ fees and reimbursement of expenses incurred by Class Counsel in 

5 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 11 of 26



prosecuting this Action. Final approval of the Settlement would result in the dismissal with 

prejudice of the Action in its entirety, against all Defendants. 

ARGUMENT 

I. 

THE COURT SHOULD GRANT PRELIMINARY APPROVAL OF 
THE SETTLEMENT BECAUSE IT IS WITHIN THE RANGE OF 
VALUE WARRANTING APPROVAL 










Public policy in the First Circuit highly favors settlement as a means of resolving 

disputes. See Hotel Holiday Inn de Isla Verde v. N.L.R.B., 723 F.2d 169, 173 (1st Cir. 1983) 

(settlement agreements “will be upheld whenever possible because they are a means of amicably 

resolving doubts and preventing lawsuits”); United States v. Comunidades Unidas Contra La 

Contaminacion, 204 F.3d 275, 280 (1st Cir. 2000). This is especially so in the context of 

complex class action litigation. See, e.g., In re Lupron Mktg. & Sales Practices Litig., 228 

F.R.D. 75, 88 (D. Mass. 2005) (“the law favors class action settlements”); see also In re Warner 

Commc’ns Sec. Litig., 618 F. Supp. 735, 740 (S.D.N.Y. 1985) (“There is little doubt that the law 

favors settlements, particularly of class action suits”) (citations omitted). By favoring the 

settlement of complex class action litigation, the law seeks to minimize the litigation expense on 

both sides, and to reduce the strain on judicial resources. In re General Motors Corp. Pick-Up 

Truck Fuel Tank Prod. Liab. Litig., 55 F.3d 768, 784 (3rd Cir. 1995) (“The law favors 

settlement, particularly in class actions and other complex cases where substantial judicial 

resources can be conserved by avoiding formal litigation”); see also NEWBERG ON CLASS 

ACTIONS, 2 Newberg & Conte § 11.41. 

In order to approve a proposed class action settlement, a court generally follows two 

steps: 

[T]he judge is required to scrutinize the proposed settlement to ensure that it is 
fair to the persons whose interests the court is to protect. Those affected may be 
entitled to notice and an opportunity to be heard. This usually involves a two-

6 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 12 of 26



stage procedure. First, the judge reviews the proposal preliminarily to determine 
whether it is sufficient to warrant public notice and a hearing. If so, the final 
decision on approval is made after the hearing. 


In re Relafen Antitrust Litig., 231 F.R.D. 52, 57 (D. Mass. 2005) (quoting MANUAL FOR 

COMPLEX LITIGATION, Fourth (“MCL”) § 13.14); see also In re Lupron Mktg. & Sales 

Practices Litig., 345 F. Supp. 2d 135 (D. Mass. 2004). At the preliminary approval stage of this 

two-step process, the Court is not required to undertake an in-depth consideration of the relevant 

factors for final approval. Instead, the “judge must make a preliminary determination on the 

fairness, reasonableness, and adequacy of the settlement terms and must direct the preparation of 

notice of the certification, proposed settlement, and date of the final fairness hearing.” MCL § 

21.632. If the court finds a settlement proposal “within the range of possible approval,” it then 

proceeds to the second step in the review process, the fairness hearing. In re Gilat Satellite 

Networks, Ltd., 2007 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 29062 at *31 (E.D.N.Y. Apr. 19, 2007) (“Preliminary 

approval of a proposed settlement is appropriate where it is the result of serious, informed, and 

non-collusive negotiations, where there are no grounds to doubt its fairness and no other obvious 

deficiencies . . . and where the settlement appears to fall within the range of possible approval”) 

(citing MCL § 30.41; In re Med. X-Ray Film Antitrust Litig., 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21936 at *6 

(E.D.N.Y. Dec. 10, 1997)). 

Applying the approach set forth above, the Court should preliminarily approve the 

Settlement because it is sufficiently fair, reasonable and adequate and thus falls squarely within 

the range of possible approval. 

First, the Settlement amount of $6,000,000 represents a fair and reasonable result after 

more than a year of litigation. During this time, each side vigorously advocated its position, as 

described in the Statement of Facts above. The Settlement amount of $6,000,000 reflects, among 

7 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 13 of 26



other things, the evidence developed against Defendants and, at the same time, recognizes the 

inherent risks, costs and potential for delay associated with a complex securities litigation, 

including the meaningful possibility that Defendants would be unable to pay a substantial 

judgment if Lead Plaintiff were to prevail in the litigation. 

Second, as set forth above, the proposed Settlement is the result of intensive arm’s-length 

negotiation between the Settling Parties, arrived at after a mediation before a respected former 

judge with significant experience mediating complex class actions, including actions asserting 

securities claims. These factors – the time and effort spent on the settlement negotiations, and 

the presence of a highly-regarded mediator – all militate in favor of preliminary approval of the 

settlement because they strongly indicate that there was no collusion in the result that was 

achieved. See In re Indep. Energy Holdings PLC Sec. Litig., 2003 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17090 at 

*13 (S.D.N.Y. Sept. 26, 2003) (“[T]he fact that the Settlement was reached after exhaustive 

arm’s-length negotiations, with the assistance of a private mediator experienced in complex 

litigation, is further proof that it is fair and reasonable”) (citing In re Sumitomo Copper Litig., 

189 F.R.D. 274, 280-81 (S.D.N.Y. 1999) (“a presumption of fairness, adequacy and 

reasonableness may attach to a class settlement reached in arms-length negotiations between 

experienced, capable counsel after meaningful discovery”) (internal quotation marks and citation 

omitted)). 

Third, the Settling Parties agreed to the terms of the Settlement after conducting several 

months of discovery. There is a presumption in favor of a proposed settlement when the parties 

have conducted sufficient discovery to allow them to investigate the pertinent factual and legal 

issues and to assess the merits of their respective cases. City P’ship Co. v. Atlantic Acquisition 

L.P., 100 F.3d 1041 (1st Cir. 1996); Rolland v. Celluci, 191 F.R.D. 3, 6 (D. Mass. 2000). In this 

8 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 14 of 26



case, Lead Plaintiff’s attorneys researched the claims against Defendants for many months prior 

to the filing of the Complaint, including reviewing the court record in the underlying PDG 

Lawsuit. After Defendants’ motion to dismiss was denied by this Court, the parties exchanged 

written initial disclosures, propounded and responded to various requests for documents and 

interrogatories, and served subpoenas on various third parties seeking additional relevant 

documents. As a result of all of these efforts, Lead Plaintiff was able to develop the facts 

concerning Defendants’ potential liability, and the Settling Parties and their counsel are capable 

of making well-informed decisions regarding the Settlement. 

Fourth, the Settling Parties are represented by counsel experienced in securities class 

action litigation. Lead Plaintiff’s counsel has extensive experience and expertise in complex 

securities litigation and class action proceedings throughout the United States. Counsel for 

Defendants similarly has extensive expertise from a long track record in securities class actions 

and has vigorously defended Defendants throughout the course of the litigation. 



For all of these reasons, Lead Plaintiff respectfully requests that the Court preliminarily 

approve the Settlement. See Hawkins v. Commissioner of N.H. Dept. of Health and Human 

Services, 2004 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 807, at *15 (D.N.H. Jan. 23, 2004) (“A presumption in favor of 

the proposed settlement arises when sufficient discovery has been provided, counsel have 

experience in similar cases, and the parties have bargained at arms-length”). 

II. 

THE COURT SHOULD PRELIMINARILY CERTIFY THE CLASS 

The proposed Class consists of all persons and entities that purchased or otherwise 

acquired ADPI’s publicly traded common stock during the Class Period from February 25, 2004 

through and including December 13, 2007. The Class excludes: the Defendants; each of ADPI’s 

officers, directors, subsidiaries and affiliates during the Class Period; members of the 

Defendants’ immediate families and their legal representatives, heirs, successors and assigns; 

9 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 15 of 26



any entity in which any of the foregoing have or had a controlling interest; and the directors and 

officers liability insurance carriers (and any affiliates or subsidiaries thereof) of ADPI. Also 

excluded from the Class are any putative Class members who exclude themselves by filing a 

request for exclusion in accordance with the requirements set forth in the notice to be provided to 

the Class. 

Courts have long acknowledged the propriety of class certification for purposes of a class 

action settlement. See In re Community Bank of Northern Va., 418 F.3d 277, 299 (3d Cir. 2005) 

(“‘all Federal Circuits recognize the utility of Rule 23(b)(3) settlement classes’ as a means to 

facilitate the settlement of complex nationwide class actions”) (quoting Amchem Prods., Inc. v. 

Windsor, 521 U.S. 591, 618 (1997)). Like any other class certification decision, certification of a 

class for settlement purposes requires a determination that the requirements of Rule 23 are met. 

Id. Specifically, a class action must meet each of the four requirements set forth in Rule 23(a), 

and at least one of three requirements set forth in Rule 23(b). See Fed. R. Civ. P. 23(b). Class 

certification is appropriate here because the Action easily meets the requirements of Rule 23(a) 

and Rule 23(b)(3). 

A. 

The Prerequisites Of Rule 23(a) Are Satisfied 

Certification is appropriate under Rule 23(a) if: (1) the class is so numerous that joinder 

of all members is impracticable; (2) there are questions of law or fact common to the class; (3) 

the claims or defenses of the representative parties are typical of the claims or defenses of the 

class; and (4) the representative parties will fairly and adequately protect the interests of the 

class. Fed. R. Civ. P. 23(a). 

1. 

The Settlement Class Is Sufficiently Numerous 

Class certification under Rule 23(a)(1) is appropriate where a class contains so many 

members that joinder of all would be impracticable. While the exact number of Class members 

10 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 16 of 26



is unknown, ADPI’s 2007 Form 10-K filed on March 10, 2008 discloses that the weighted 

average number of shares of common stock outstanding during 2004 (the first year of the Class 

Period) was approximately 11.37 million and that the weighted average number of shares of 

common stock outstanding during 2007 (the last year of the Class Period) was 12.68 million. 

During the Class Period, the average daily trading volume for ADPI’s common stock was 

approximately 86,000 shares.2 Based on the foregoing, it is reasonable to presume that the Class 

consists of thousands of geographically dispersed members, and thus the joinder of all members 

would be impracticable. See In re Transkaryotic Therapies, Inc. Sec. Litig., No. Civ.A.03-

10165-RWZ, 2005 WL 3178162, at *2 (D. Mass. Nov. 28, 2005) (“Other measures may be used 

to approximate class size. For example, ‘how many shares of stock were outstanding’ and ‘the 

average daily trading volume during the Class Period [are] both factors commonly considered by 

courts when finding the numerosity prong satisfied despite the absence of specific information 

about the number of individuals who purchased the stock during the relevant period.’”) (citations 

omitted); Kinney v. Metro Global Media, Inc., No. Civ. A. 99-579 ML, 2002 WL 31015604, at 

*4 (D.R.I. Aug. 22, 2002) (rejecting defendants’ contention that numerosity element was not 

satisfied and noting that, “[b]y sheer virtue of the fact that Metro Global stock was traded over 

the Nasdaq small cap market during the class period (over three years), and that during that time 

thousands, if not millions, of the shares were traded, common sense dictates that the proposed 

class is very large.”). Accordingly, the Class is sufficiently numerous to satisfy Rule 23(a)(1). 

2. 

There Are Common Questions Of Law And Fact 

Federal securities cases like this one easily meet the commonality requirement of Rule 

23(a)(2), because the claims of all Class members arise from the same course of conduct by the 

2 
common stock. 

This calculation was derived from publicly available information concerning the daily trading in ADPI’s 

11 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 17 of 26



Defendants and involve the same legal theories. Rule 23(a)(2) only requires “that questions of 

law or fact be shared by the prospective class, but does not require that every question be 

common.” Kirby v. Cullinet Software, Inc., 116 F.R.D. 303, 306 (D. Mass. 1987) (concluding 

that plaintiffs’ securities fraud claims raised common questions, and granting motion for class 

certification). Further, “‘[t]he threshold of commonality is not a difficult one to meet,’ especially 

when ‘there are a number of common issues of fact and law that the class members would be 

required to establish to prove the defendants’ liability, as well as their entitlement to damages.’” 

In re Transkaryotic Therapies, Inc., 2005 WL 3178162, at *2. 

Here, Lead Plaintiff’s claims against the Defendants present many questions of law and 

fact which are common to all members of the Class, including: 

• Whether the Defendants participated in and pursued the course 

of conduct described in the Complaint; 

• Whether 

the Defendants’ alleged misrepresentations and 

omissions were material; 

• Whether the Defendants’ conduct violated Sections 10(b) 

and/or 20(a) of the Exchange Act; 

• To what extent the Class members have sustained damages that 
were caused by the Defendants’ violations of the securities 
laws; and 

• The proper measure of the damages sustained by members of 

the Class. 

Thus, the Rule 23(a)(2) commonality requirement is satisfied. 

3. 

The Class Representatives’ Claims Are Typical Of 
Those Of The Settlement Class 



Rule 23(a)(3) requires that “the claims or defenses of the representative parties are typical 

of the claims or defenses of the class.” Fed. R. Civ. P. 23(a)(3). “In general, ‘a plaintiff's claim 

is typical if it arises from the same event or practice or course of conduct that gives rise to the 

12 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 18 of 26



claims of other class members, and if his or her claims are based on the same legal theory.’” In 

re Transkaryotic Therapies, Inc. Sec. Litig., 2005 WL 3178162, at *3 (citation omitted). 

However, “[a]s with the commonality requirement, the typicality requirement does not mandate 

that the claims of the class representative be identical to those of the absent class members.” 

Swack v. Credit Suisse First Boston, 230 F.R.D. 250, 260 (D. Mass. 2005). See also Abelson v. 

Strong, MDL No. 584, Civ. A. No. 85-0592-S, 1987 WL 15872, at *2 (D. Mass. July 30, 1987) 

(“‘When it is alleged that the same unlawful conduct was directed at or affected both the named 

plaintiff and the class sought to be represented, the typicality requirement is usually met.’ Seen 

in this light, the burden on plaintiffs in proving typicality is not ‘very substantial’”) (citations 

omitted); Priest v. Zayre Corp., 118 F.R.D. 552, 555 (D. Mass. 1988) (“‘With respect to 

typicality under Rule 23(a)(3), plaintiffs need not show substantial identity between their claims 

and those of absent class members, but need only show that their claims arise from the same 

course of conduct that gave rise to the claims of the absent members.’ ‘The question is simply 

whether a named plaintiff, in presenting his case, will necessarily present the claims of the absent 

plaintiffs.’”) (citations omitted). 

Here, the injuries to Lead Plaintiff and the members of the Class are attributable to the 

same alleged course of conduct by the Defendants, and liability for this conduct is predicated on 

the same legal theories. As such, the Rule 23(a)(3) typicality requirement is satisfied. 

4. 

Lead Plaintiff And Class Counsel Will Fairly And Adequately 
Protect The Interest Of The Class 









Rule 23(a)(4) is satisfied if “the representative parties will fairly and adequately protect 

the interests of the class.” Fed. R. Civ. P. 23(a)(4). The Court must measure the adequacy of 

representation by two standards: (1) whether the plaintiffs’ counsel are qualified, experienced, 

and generally able to conduct the litigation; and (2) whether the class representative has interests 

13 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 19 of 26



antagonistic to those of the class. In re Transkaryotic Therapies, Inc. Sec. Litig., 2005 WL 

3178162, at *4. 

Here, Class Counsel has extensive experience and expertise in complex securities 

litigation and class action proceedings throughout the United States, and is qualified and able to 

conduct this litigation – as they have demonstrated in drafting the Complaint, defeating the 

Defendants’ motion to dismiss, and negotiating the Settlement. Moreover, Lead Plaintiff and the 

Class share the common goal of maximizing recovery, and there is no conflict between them. 

Rule 23(a)(4) is therefore satisfied. 

B. 

The Class’s Claims Satisfy The Prerequisites Of Rule 23(b)(3) 

Rule 23(b)(3) authorizes class certification if “the court finds that the questions of law or 

fact common to class members predominate over any questions affecting only individual 

members, and that a class action is superior to other available methods for fairly and efficiently 

adjudicating the controversy.” Fed. R. Civ. P. 23(b)(3). These requirements are easily met in 

this case. 

1. 

Common Legal And Factual Questions Predominate 

“Class-wide issues predominate if resolution of some of the legal or factual questions that 

qualify each class member’s case as a genuine controversy can be achieved through generalized 

proof, and if these particular issues are more substantial than the issues subject only to 

individualized proof.” In re Livent, Inc. Noteholders Sec. Litig., 210 F.R.D. 512, 517 (S.D.N.Y. 

2002) (common issues predominate where “each class member is alleged to have suffered the 

same kind of harm pursuant to the same legal theory arising out of the same alleged course of 

conduct [and] the only individualized question concerns the amount of damages”); In re 

Transkaryotic Therapies, Inc. Sec. Litig., 2005 WL 3178162, at *2 (“where . . . common 

questions predominate regarding liability, then courts generally find the predominance 

14 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 20 of 26



requirement to be satisfied even if individual damages issues remain.”) (citation omitted). The 

Rule 23(b)(3) test of predominance is “readily met” in securities fraud cases. Amchem Prods., 

521 U.S. at 625; see also Randle v. Spectran, 129 F.R.D. 386, 393 (D. Mass. 1988) (holding that 

“common questions with respect to the existence and materiality of misleading statements or 

omissions in documents or press releases concerning [corporation’s] securities, along with the 

related questions of defendants’ liability for such alleged statements or omissions, predominate 

over any individual questions in this action.”). 

Here, all the Class members’ claims against Defendants are based on the same alleged 

course of conduct by the Defendants. There are numerous common issues relating to the 

Defendants’ liability which predominate over any individualized issues. The predominance 

requirement of Rule 23(b)(3) is therefore satisfied. 

2. 

A Class Action Is Superior To Other Methods Of Adjudication 

Rule 23(b)(3) sets forth the following non-exhaustive factors to be considered in making 

a determination of whether class certification is the superior method of litigation: “(A) the class 

members’ interests in individually controlling the prosecution . . . of separate actions; (B) the 

extent and nature of any litigation concerning the controversy already begun by . . . class 

members; (C) the desirability . . . of concentrating the litigation of the claims in the particular 

forum; and (D) the likely difficulties in managing a class action.” Fed. R. Civ. P. 23(b)(3). 

Considering these factors, this class action is clearly “superior to other available methods 

for the fair and efficient adjudication” of the claims of the vast number of purchasers of ADPI 

stock. Lead Plaintiff is unaware of any other litigation already commenced by individual Class 

members, which is not surprising given the tremendous costs associated with such litigation. 

Indeed, courts in this Circuit have concluded that the class action device in securities cases is 

usually the superior method by which to redress injuries to a large number of individual 

15 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 21 of 26



plaintiffs. Swack, 230 F.R.D. at 273 (“the piecemeal adjudication of numerous separate lawsuits 

covering the same or substantially similar issues--i.e., the Defendants’ allegedly illegal conduct 

and the impact thereof on the market price of Razorfish stock--would be an inefficient allocation 

of limited court resources.”) As one court has held, absent the class action device “the very real 

risk [is] that potential class members with relatively small claims would not have the financial 

incentives or wherewithal to seek legal redress for their injuries.” In re Transkaryotic Therapies, 

Inc. Sec. Litig., 2005 WL 3178162, at *2. 

The scope and complexity of Lead Plaintiff’s claims against Defendants, together with 

the massive cost of individualized litigation, make it unlikely that the vast majority of the Class 

members would be able to seek relief without class certification. Moreover, it is clearly 

desirable to concentrate the claims of all Class members in this forum, and Lead Plaintiff does 

not foresee any difficulties in the management and settlement of this action as a class action. 

Accordingly, the requirements of Rule 23(b)(3) are satisfied, and the Court should preliminarily 

certify this action as a class action on behalf of the proposed Class. 

III. THE FORM AND CONTENT OF THE PROPOSED NOTICE TO 


THE CLASS ARE SUFFICIENT 

In order to afford class members the opportunity to object to a proposed class-wide 

settlement, reasonable notice must be provided to those class members. Durett v. Housing 

Authority of City of Providence, 896 F.2d 600, 604 (1st Cir. 1990). Where a proposed settlement 

is coupled with a request for class certification under Rule 23(b)(3) of the Federal Rules of Civil 

Procedure, class notice must meet the requirements of both Rules 23(c)(2) and 23(e). 

In terms of the form and manner of providing notice, Rule 23(e)(1) instructs courts to 

“direct notice in a reasonable manner to all class members who would be bound by the 

proposal.” while Rule 23(c)(2)(B) requires the notice to be the “best notice that is practicable 

16 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 22 of 26



under the circumstances, including individual notice to all members who can be identified 

through reasonable effort.” “Rule 23 does not require the parties to exhaust every conceivable 

method of identifying the individual class members,” and “[f]or those whose names and 

addresses cannot be determined by reasonable efforts, notice by publication will suffice under 

Rule 23(c)(2) and under the due process clause.” In re Prudential Ins. Co. of Am. Sales 

Practices Litig., 177 F.R.D. 216, 232 (D.N.J. 1997); see also id. at 231 (“due process does not 

require actual notice, but rather a good faith effort to provide actual notice”). 

The content of a class notice in a securities class action is governed by Rule 23(c)(2)(B) 

and the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 (the “PSLRA”). Rule 23(c)(2)(B) 

requires that the notice: 

clearly and concisely state in plain, easily understood language: (i) the nature of 
the action; (ii) the definition of the class certified; (iii) the class claims, issues, or 
defenses; (iv) that a class member may enter an appearance through an attorney if 
the member so desires; (v) that the court will exclude from the class any member 
who requests exclusion; (vi) the time and manner for requesting exclusion; and 
(vii) the binding effect of a class judgment on members under Rule 23(c)(3). 



The PSLRA requires disclosure of the following additional information: 

• The amount of the settlement proposed to be distributed to the 
parties to the action, determined in the aggregate and on an 
average per share basis; 

• 

If the parties do not agree on the average amount of damages 
per share that would be recoverable if the plaintiff prevailed on 
each claim alleged, a statement from each settling party 
concerning the issue or issues on which the parties disagree; 

• A statement indicating which parties or counsel intend to apply 
for an award of fees or costs from the settlement fund, as well 
as the amount to be requested (including on an average per 
share basis) and a brief explanation supporting the fees and 
costs sought; 

• The name and contact information of representatives of 
plaintiffs’ counsel who will be reasonably available to answer 
class members’ questions; and 

17 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 23 of 26



• The reasons for the settlement. 

See 15 U.S.C. § 78u-4(a)(7). 

In the present case, both the form and the content of the proposed notice to the Class are 

sufficient and should be approved by the Court. 

First, Lead Plaintiff has submitted two forms of notice to the Court for approval: a long-

form Notice (“Notice”) and a Summary Publication Notice (“Publication Notice”), attached as 

Exhibits 1 and 3, respectively, to the proposed Order of Preliminary Approval. Lead Plaintiff 

has agreed to publish the Publication Notice in Investor’s Business Daily; to send the Notice by 

first-class mail to those members of the Class whose addresses can be identified through 

reasonable effort; and to post the Notice on Class Counsel’s and the claims administrator’s 

websites. These are all well-established means of providing legally sufficient notice in securities 

class actions. See, e.g., Fidel v. Farley, 534 F.3d 508, 514-15 (6th Cir. 2008) (notice program 

“comported with the requirements of both due process and Rule 23(c)(2)(B)” where notice was 

mailed to brokerage houses and summary notice was published in Investor’s Business Daily and 

on the internet); In re Warner Chilcott Ltd. Sec. Litig., No. 06-cv-11515, 2008 WL 5110904, at 

*3 (S.D.N.Y. Nov. 20, 2008) (same); In re Wireless Facilities, Inc. Sec. Litig. II, 253 F.R.D. 607, 

613 (S.D. Cal. 2008) (notice program was adequate where it involved mailing to stockholders 

who could be identified with reasonable effort, plus publication of a summary notice in 

Investor’s Business Daily); Adams v. Amplidyne, Inc., No. 99-cv-4468, 2001 WL 34885324, at 

**1-2 (D.N.J. Aug. 15, 2001) (same). 

Second, the Notice provides detailed descriptions of the action, the Settlement, the Class, 

and the options available to potential Class members, including the right to object or opt out. See 

Exhibit 1 to the proposed Order of Preliminary Approval. The Publication Notice provides 

similar information in a summary form, and informs the reader how to obtain a copy of the more 

18 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 24 of 26



detailed Notice. See Exhibit 3 to the proposed Order of Preliminary Approval. With respect to 

the PSLRA’s requirements, the Notice: (1) states the aggregate and per share amounts that are 

estimated to be distributed to the Class; (2) describes the parties’ areas of disagreement with 

respect to the Class’s recoverable damages; (3) states that Class Counsel will request attorneys’ 

fees and reimbursement of litigation expenses and the basis for the request; (4) identifies 

representatives of Class Counsel who can be contacted for additional information; and 

(5) explains the reasons for the Settlement. 

Accordingly, Lead Plaintiff respectfully requests that this Court approve the form and 

content of the proposed Notice and Publication Notice. 

19 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 25 of 26



CONCLUSION 

For all the foregoing reasons, Lead Plaintiff respectfully requests that the Court enter an 

order in the form of the proposed Order of Preliminary Approval accompanying this motion: 

(1) preliminarily approving the proposed settlement as within the range of possible fairness, 

reasonableness and adequacy; (2) preliminarily certifying the Class for purposes of the 

Settlement; (3) approving the form and manner of the proposed Summary Notice and Notice; and 

(4) setting a date and time for the hearing regarding final approval of the Settlement, Plan of 

Allocation, and Class Counsel’s application for attorneys’ fees. 



Dated: December 15, 2009 























Respectfully submitted, 

/s/ Megan D. McIntyre_______________ 
GRANT & EISENHOFER P.A. 
Stuart M. Grant (BBO # 549471) 
Megan D. McIntyre (pro hac vice) 
Hung G. Ta (pro hac vice) 
1201 N. Market St. 
Wilmington, DE 19801 
Tel: (302) 622-7000 
Fax: (302) 622-7100 
Counsel for Lead Plaintiff Operating Engineers 
Construction Industry and Miscellaneous Pension 
Fund, and Lead Counsel for the Class. 



20 

Case 1:08-cv-10119-RGS Document 35 Filed 12/15/2009 Page 26 of 26



CERTIFICATE OF SERVICE 



I hereby certify that on December 15, 2009 the attached Memorandum of Law in Support 

of Motion For Preliminary Class Certification, Preliminary Approval Of Proposed Settlement, 

Approval Of Form And Manner Of Notice, And Setting Of Final Fairness Hearing was served 

upon the following counsel of record via CM/ECF: 















Bonnie S. McGuire (BBO #651519) 
Michelle L. Visser (BBO #663164) 

ROPES & GRAY LLP 
One International Place 

Boston, MA 02110 











/s/ Megan D. McIntyre 
Megan D. McIntyre (pro hac vice) 









21 















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          




























Amazon Prime

































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















All



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 





















































































There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started































 

Fast, FREE shipping and morePrime members also enjoy exclusive access to movies and TV shows, ad-free music, Kindle books, original audio series and unlimited photo storage.







Start your 30-day Prime free trial 

After your free trial, Amazon Prime is just $10.99/month.  Cancel anytime.
                    
                              See more plans  ›


Give the gift of Prime | 
                            Refer a friend | 
                            Have a Prime promo code?




    
    
    



Fast, FREE shipping on over 50 million eligible itemsChoose from FREE Two-Hour, Same-Day or Two-Day Delivery with Prime    
    
    



Need a last minute gift? Can’t get out of the house? Realize you forgot to pick up something? With FREE Two-Day Shipping and more from Amazon Prime, your shopping problems are solved. You get unlimited deliveries with no minimum order size, and with millions of eligible items, the options are practically limitless. When shipping to select metro areas, Prime members also get FREE Same-Day Delivery on over a million items and FREE 2-hour delivery with Prime Now on daily essentials and groceries. With FREE release-date delivery on eligible pre-order items, you can enjoy highly anticipated books, movies, and video games as soon as possible. 
Learn more about all the Prime shipping options

    
    
    



Enjoy instant access to video streaming    
    
    



Prime includes popular movies and TV shows    
    
    



Make every night a movie night with Prime Video. Your Prime membership includes instant access to thousands of movies and TV shows at no additional cost. Catch Amazon Original Series like Golden Globe-winning Transparent, Mozart in the Jungle, and Goliath, Emmy-winning Man in the High Castle, or exciting and wildly popular The Grand Tour. Stream on select Smart TVs, Roku, Xbox, Amazon Fire TV, iPhones, tablets, and Android devices. Download entertainment to your device to watch offline anywhere.
Browse movies and TV shows
    
    
    



Over two million songs. Thousands of playlists and stations.    
    
    



On-demand, ad-free music streaming     
    
    



Prime Music is a music streaming benefit featuring a growing selection of two million songs, Alexa voice-integration, and personalized recommendations at no additional cost with your Amazon Prime Membership. Unlock even more music with Amazon Music Unlimited, plus get an exclusive Prime member discount.
Learn more
    
    
    



Books, Magazines & More    
    
    



Unlimited reading on any device    
    
    



Prime Reading gives you unlimited access to over a thousand books, current issue magazines, books with Audible narration, comics, Kindle Singles, and more. With access from any device – including your phone, tablet, or Kindle – you can read however you want, whenever you want.
Learn more
    
    
    



Original audio series from Audible    
    
    



Unlimited listening to original audio series    
    
    



Get hooked on original audio series from Audible: hunt for clues with intrepid investigators, think big with bold visionaries, or ‘keep it real’ with fearless comedians. Listen to insightful and engaging playlists handcrafted for every interest and refreshed daily, drawing from news, comedy shows, articles, talks and more. Whether you want to turn rush hour into an adventure with a great story or master a new topic while riding the train, your commute will never be the same. Audible Channels–from Audible, a world leader in audio entertainment.
Learn More
    
    
    



Twitch Prime    
    
    



Get free game content every month, exclusive discounts, plus loads more    
    
    



Get a member exclusive discount on new release and preorder boxed video games. You'll get characters, vehicles, skins, and boosts for top games on Twitch, plus surprises like full indie games and exclusive loot. You also receive ad-free viewing and a free monthly Twitch channel subscription to support your favorite streamer.
Learn more
    
    
    



All your photos, together at last    
    
    



Free unlimited photo storage    
    
    



Your Prime membership comes with free unlimited photo storage through Prime Photos, which lets you securely save as many photos as you like and see them on your phone, computer, or tablet. You can share this Prime benefit and give free photo storage to up to five family members or friends. Collect photos together with your invited family and friends in the Family Vault and store memories from everyone in one safe place. New photo search technology makes it easy to find specific photos by searching for things like “sunset” or “Seattle,” and your photos are organized automatically so it’s easy to find and enjoy them.
Learn more
    
    
    



Prime Rewards    
    
    



Cardmembers earn 5% Back with a Prime Credit Card.    
    
    



Eligible Prime members can earn 5% back at Amazon.com using the Amazon Prime Rewards Visa Card or the Amazon Prime Store card. All Prime members earn 2% rewards on their debit spending with Amazon Prime Reload.
Learn More

    
    
    



Get Early Access    
    
    



30-minute early access to select Amazon Lightning Deals    
    
    



Consider yourself a techy, the best-styled fashionista on the block, or just an everyday savvy shopper? Be among the first to decide what's hot and what's not. Get 30-minute early access to select Lightning Deals on Amazon.

Shop Amazon Lightning Deals

Look for Prime eligible items, videos, music and Kindle books are clearly marked. Just look for the Prime logo when you shop. 














  Back to top      Get to Know Us   Careers   About Amazon   Investor Relations   Amazon Devices      Make Money with Us   Sell on Amazon   Sell Your Services on Amazon   Sell on Amazon Business   Sell Your Apps on Amazon   Become an Affiliate   Advertise Your Products   Self-Publish with Us   Become an Amazon Vendor   Sell Your Subscription on Amazon   › See all      Amazon Payment Products   Amazon Rewards Visa Signature Cards   Amazon.com Store Card   Amazon.com Corporate Credit Line   Shop with Points   Credit Card Marketplace   Reload Your Balance   Amazon Currency Converter      Let Us Help You   Your Account   Your Orders   Shipping Rates & Policies   Amazon Prime   Returns & Replacements   Manage Your Content and Devices   Amazon Assistant   Help                   English   United States          Amazon Music Stream millionsof songs       Amazon Drive Cloud storagefrom Amazon       6pm Score dealson fashion brands       AbeBooks Books, art& collectibles       ACX Audiobook PublishingMade Easy       Alexa Actionable Analyticsfor the Web       Amazon Business Everything ForYour Business          AmazonFresh Groceries & MoreRight To Your Door       AmazonGlobal Ship OrdersInternationally       Home Services Handpicked ProsHappiness Guarantee       Amazon Inspire Digital EducationalResources       Amazon Rapids Fun stories forkids on the go       Amazon Restaurants Food delivery fromlocal restaurants       Amazon Video Direct Video DistributionMade Easy          Amazon Web Services Scalable CloudComputing Services       Audible DownloadAudio Books       AudiobookStand Discount Audiobookson Disc       Book Depository Books With FreeDelivery Worldwide       Box Office Mojo Find MovieBox Office Data       ComiXology Thousands ofDigital Comics       CreateSpace Indie Print PublishingMade Easy          DPReview DigitalPhotography       East Dane Designer Men'sFashion       Fabric Sewing, Quilting& Knitting       Goodreads Book reviews& recommendations       IMDb Movies, TV& Celebrities       IMDbPro Get Info EntertainmentProfessionals Need       Junglee.com Shop Onlinein India          Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital PublishingMade Easy       Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Deliveryon Everyday Items       Prime Photos Unlimited Photo StorageFree With Prime       Shopbop DesignerFashion Brands       TenMarks.com Math Activitiesfor Kids & Schools       Warehouse Deals Open-BoxDiscounts       Whispercast Discover & DistributeDigital Content               Withoutabox Submit toFilm Festivals       Woot! Deals andShenanigans       Zappos Shoes &Clothing       Souq.com Shop Online inthe Middle East       Subscribe with Amazon Discover & trysubscription services               Conditions of Use   Privacy Notice   Interest-Based Ads   © 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates    










v



































Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings













































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v























